Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5207
Board; quorum.

Four of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of official business. The affirmative vote of at least four members shall be necessary for any action to be taken by the board. No vacancy in the membership of the board shall constitute an impairment of a quorum to exercise any and all rights and perform all duties of the board.

Laws 1999, LB 630, § 8.